Massachusetts, session 194th, H2023.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
1. Whereas, the deferred operation of this act would tend to defeat its purpose, which is to
forthwith make certain changes in laws relative to the administration of justice in the
Commonwealth, to permit fair sentencing of non-violent drug offenders, to reduce the rate of
incarceration in the Commonwealth occasioned, in large part, by minimum mandatory drug laws,
to prevent the application of equally severe penalties for both the more and the less culpable
offenders, and to eliminate the disproportionate impact minimum mandatory drug laws have on
minority communities, therefore, it is hereby declared to be an emergency law, retroactive in
application, as necessary for the immediate preservation of the public convenience.
2. Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled,
and by the authority of the same, as follows:
a) Section 32 of General Law Chapter 94C, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition is
hereby amended as follows:
of 4

i. Paragraph (b) shall be stricken and replaced with the following: Any person convicted
of violating this section after one or more prior convictions of manufacturing, distributing,
dispensing or possessing with the intent to manufacture, distribute, or dispense a controlled
substance as defined by section thirty–one of this chapter under this or any prior law of this
jurisdiction or of any offense of any other jurisdiction, federal, state, or territorial, which is the
same as or necessarily includes the elements of said offense shall be punished by a term of
imprisonment in the state prison for not more than fifteen years or by imprisonment in a jail or
house of correction for not more than two and one–half years, or a fine of not less than two
thousand and five hundred nor more than twenty–five thousand dollars, or by both such fine and
imprisonment.
ii. Paragraph (c) and its subparagraphs shall be stricken.
b) Section 32E of General Law Chapter 94C, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition is
hereby amended as follows:
i. Paragraph (a) and its subparagraphs shall be stricken and replaced with the following:
(a) Any person who trafficks in marijuana by knowingly or intentionally manufacturing,
distributing, dispensing, or cultivating or possessing with intent to manufacture, distribute,
dispense, or cultivate, or by bringing into the commonwealth a net weight of fifty pounds or
more of marijuana or a net weight of fifty pounds or more of any mixture containing marijuana
shall be punished by a term of imprisonment in the state prison for not more than fifteen years or
by imprisonment in a jail or house of correction for not more than two and one–half years, or a
fine of not less than five hundred nor more than two hundred thousand dollars, or by both such
fine and imprisonment.
of 4

ii. Paragraph (b) and its subparagraphs shall be stricken and replaced with the following:
(b) Any person who trafficks in a controlled substance defined in clause (4) of paragraph (a),
clause (2) of paragraph (c) or in clause (3) of paragraph (c) of Class B of section thirty–one by
knowingly or intentionally manufacturing, distributing or dispensing or possessing with intent to
manufacture, distribute or dispense or by bringing into the commonwealth a net weight of 18
grams or more of a controlled substance as so defined, or a net weight of 18 grams or more of
any mixture containing a controlled substance as so defined shall be punished by a term of
imprisonment in the state prison for not more than 15 years or by imprisonment in a jail or house
of correction for not more than two and one–half years, or a fine of not less two thousand five
hundred dollars nor more than five-hundred thousand dollars, or by both such fine and
imprisonment.
iii. Paragraph (c) and its subparagraphs shall be stricken and replaced with the following:
(c) Any person who trafficks in heroin or any salt thereof, a controlled substance defined in
paragraph (d) of Class A of section 31, morphine or any salt thereof, opium or any derivative
thereof by knowingly or intentionally manufacturing, distributing or dispensing or possessing
with intent to manufacture, distribute, or dispense or by bringing into the commonwealth a net
weight of 18 grams or more of heroin or any salt thereof, a controlled substance defined in
paragraph (d) of Class A of section 31, morphine or any salt thereof, opium or any derivative
thereof or a net weight of 18 grams or more of any mixture containing heroin or any salt thereof,
a controlled substance defined in paragraph (d) of Class A of section 31, morphine or any salt
thereof, opium or any derivative thereof shall be punished by a term of imprisonment in the state
prison for not more than 15 years or by imprisonment in a jail or house of correction for not
of 4

more than two and one–half years, or a fine of not less two thousand five hundred dollars nor
more than five-hundred thousand dollars, or by both such fine and imprisonment.
iv. Paragraphs (c½), (c¾), and (d) and its subparagraphs shall be stricken.
c) Section 32H of General Law Chapter 94C, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition is
hereby stricken.
of 4